District of Columbia statutes.
22-2710

Procuring for house of prostitution.

Any person who, within the District of Columbia, shall pay or receive any money or other valuable thing for or on account of the procuring for, or placing in, a house of prostitution, for purposes of sexual intercourse, prostitution, debauchery, or other immoral act, any individual, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 5 years and by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 833, ch. 404, § 6
as added Jan. 3, 1941, 54 Stat. 1226, ch. 936, § 4
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 13(a), 41 DCR 1639
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 229(d), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-2710.
1973 Ed., § 22-2710.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 229(d) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.